Alabama, session 2026rs, SB175.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Sections 45-48-231.20, 45-48-231.22, and
45-48-231.24, Code of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as
follows:
"§45-48-231.20
The Sheriff of Marshall County shall sell, at public
auction or by Internet auction, abandoned and stolen personal
property recovered by the sheriff's department which has
remained unclaimed by the owner for a period of 12 consecutive
months."
"§45-48-231.22
Except for perishable property sold pursuant to Section
45-48-231.0145-48-431.21, at least every six months, the
Sheriff of Marshall County, shall sell at public auction to
the highest bidder for cash all abandoned or stolen personal
property which that has been recovered by the sheriff's
department, which and that has remained unclaimed by the owner
after a period of 12 months. The sale shall be made after
notice has been given by publication in a newspaper of general
circulation in Marshall County once a week for two successive
weeks or by posting notice in a conspicuous place at the
Page 1

weeks or by posting notice in a conspicuous place at the
SB175 Enrolled
Marshall County Courthouse for a period of at least 20 days
prior to the sale. The notice shall contain the place, date,
and time of each auction and a description of each item of
personal property to be sold at auction. If publication of the
notice is made by publication in the newspaper, the first
notice shall run at least 20 days prior to the auction."
"§45-48-231.24
Whenever any property is sold at public auction, the
sale shall be paid only in cash. A notation in the storage
record book shall be made of the sale and of the amount
received for the any property sold at auction. The person
making the sale shall have the right to reject any and all
bids bid if the bid amount is deemed unreasonably low. The
sale may continue, from time to time, if no bidders are
present."
Section 2. Section 45-48-231.27 is added to the Code of
Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
§45-48-231.27
(a)(1) The sheriff shall keep and maintain a permanent
record of all abandoned or stolen firearms not subject to
disposition by general law. The records shall state the
description of the firearm; the serial or other identifying
number, if any, of the firearm; and the place where the
firearm was recovered. The sheriff shall take reasonable
efforts to locate the owner of abandoned or stolen firearms
recovered by the sheriff's office, including by notifying the
sheriff's offices of surrounding counties.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the term
Page 2

(2) For the purposes of this section, the term
SB175 Enrolled
"firearm" shall have the same meaning as provided in Section
13A-8-1.
(b) Unless otherwise provided by law, the sheriff may
sell or destroy a firearm if the owner does not claim the
firearm within 12 months of the date the sheriff obtained the
firearm.
(c) The sheriff may sell a firearm only to gun dealers
who have a current federal firearm license on the date of the
sale. The sheriff shall establish a procedure to notify gun
dealers of a sale. A firearm shall be sold to the gun dealer
submitting the highest sealed bid. The proceeds of the sale,
after deducting and paying all expenses incurred in the
recovery, maintenance, and sale of the firearm, shall be paid
to the Office of the Sheriff of Marshall County.
(d) The sheriff may establish a procedure to destroy
firearms and may expend necessary funds of the sheriff's
office for that purpose.
Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3

1, 2026.
SB175 Enrolled






________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate



________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives


SB175
Senate 22-Jan-26
I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
the Senate.

Patrick Harris,
Secretary.


100
101
102 House of Representatives
103 Passed: 29-Jan-26
104
105
106
107
108 By: Senator Kitchens
Page 4